Hawaii statutes.
[§266-1.5] Honolulu harbor Piers 1 and 2;
jurisdiction. Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the department of
transportation shall have jurisdiction and administrative authority over
Honolulu harbor Piers 1 and 2 and the contiguous backup fast lands currently
used for manifested cargo and passenger operations. This area is defined as
all of lot 3 and parcels A and B of the Forrest Avenue subdivision, as shown on
the map filed with the bureau of conveyances of the State of Hawaii, as file
plan 2335, and lot A-2, as shown on map 2, filed in the office of the assistant
registrar of the land court of the State of Hawaii with land court application
1328; provided that all existing easements affecting and appurtenant to the
parcels to be deleted from the Kakaako community development district
boundaries shall not be affected by this change. [L 2006, c 165, §3]

Note

Further requirements on conveyance of parcels at Piers 1 and
2. L 2006, c 165, §5.

Cross References

Foreign-trade zone; jurisdiction, see §212-5.5.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next